California, session 20252026, AB1019.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30070 of the Government Code is amended to read:30070. (a) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, the program authorized by this chapter shall be funded from the Local Law Enforcement Services Account in the Local Revenue Fund 2011. The Controller shall, on a quarterly basis, beginning on October 1, 2011, allocate 4.07 percent of the moneys annually deposited in the Local Law Enforcement Services Account. Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year, the program authorized by this chapter shall be funded from the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount in the Local Revenue Fund 2011. Subsequent to the allocation described in subdivision (c) of Section 29552, the Controller shall allocate 4.06682787 percent of the remaining moneys annually deposited in the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount in the Local Revenue Fund 2011. Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, subsequent to the allocation described in subdivision (d) of Section 29552, the Controller shall allocate 4.06682787 percent of the remaining moneys annually deposited in the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount in the Local Revenue Fund 2011. Funds shall be allocated in monthly installments to county sheriffs’ departments to enhance law enforcement efforts in the counties specified in paragraphs (1) to (37), inclusive, according to the following schedule:(1) Alpine County ........................ 2.7027%(2) Amador County ........................ 2.7027%(3) Butte County ........................ 2.7027%(4) Calaveras County ........................ 2.7027%(5) Colusa County ........................ 2.7027%(6) Del Norte County ........................ 2.7027%(7) El Dorado County ........................ 2.7027%(8) Glenn County ........................ 2.7027%(9) Humboldt County ........................ 2.7027%(10) Imperial County ........................ 2.7027%(11) Inyo County ........................ 2.7027%(12) Kings County ........................ 2.7027%(13) Lake County ........................ 2.7027%(14) Lassen County ........................ 2.7027%(15) Madera County ........................ 2.7027%(16) Marin County ........................ 2.7027%(17) Mariposa County ........................ 2.7027%(18) Mendocino County ........................ 2.7027%(19) Merced County ........................ 2.7027%(20) Modoc County ........................ 2.7027%(21) Mono County ........................ 2.7027%(22) Napa County ........................ 2.7027%(23) Nevada County ........................ 2.7027%(24) Placer County ........................ 2.7027%(25) Plumas County ........................ 2.7027%(26) San Benito County ........................ 2.7027%(27) San Luis Obispo County ........................ 2.7027%(28) Santa Cruz County ........................ 2.7027%(29) Shasta County ........................ 2.7027%(30) Sierra County ........................ 2.7027%(31) Siskiyou County ........................ 2.7027%(32) Sutter County ........................ 2.7027%(33) Tehama County ........................ 2.7027%(34) Trinity County ........................ 2.7027%(35) Tuolumne County ........................ 2.7027%(36) Yolo County ........................ 2.7027%(37) Yuba County ........................ 2.7027%(b) Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall not be used by local agencies to supplant other funding for Public Safety Services, as defined in Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.(c) The funds allocated pursuant to this section may not be used for any video surveillance or monitoring of the general public.(d) A county sheriff’s department may use up to 20 percent of the funds allocated pursuant to this section for the identification of unidentified human remains, including using funds for forensic examination and genealogical research related to the identification of those human remains.